Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6504
Sections; applicability.

Sections 71-6501 to 71-6503 do not apply to the performance of health maintenance activities by designated care aides pursuant to section 38-2219 or to persons who provide personal assistant services, respite care or habilitation services, or aged and disabled services.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 42;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 85.